Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-207
Married woman; not bound by covenant in joint deed.

A married woman shall not be bound by any covenant in a joint deed of herself and husband.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 53, p. 291;

R.S.1913, § 1566;

C.S.1922, § 1515;

C.S.1929, § 42-207;

R.S.1943, § 42-207.

Wife joining with husband in conveyance of his property, in order to release her interest in same, is not liable in damages for breach of covenants of warranty. Pauley v. Knouse, 109 Neb. 716, 192 N.W. 195 (1923).

Wife is not liable on covenants in mortgage which she signed to release dower rights. Pochin v. Conley, 74 Neb. 429, 104 N.W. 878 (1905).

Wife is liable on covenant of warranty on conveyance of separate estate, though husband joins. Real v. Hollister, 17 Neb. 661, 24 N.W. 333 (1885).